Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 7 PROPERTY TAX RELIEF
§ 63-717. Reimbursement by state tax commission.

By no later than December 20 of each year, the state tax commission shall pay to the county tax collector of each county one-half (1/2) of the amount due each county as reimbursement for property taxes deferred as provided in sections 63-712 through 63-721, Idaho Code, as shown on the property tax reduction roll required under section 63-707, Idaho Code, as modified by actions of the state tax commission relating to claims approved or disapproved by the state tax commission, and shall pay the second one-half (1/2) of such amount by not later than June 20 of the following year. The payments may be combined with payments made under section 63-709, Idaho Code.

The total amount of reimbursement payable to all counties under this section shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in regard to property taxes for one (1) calendar year. In the event that the amount of taxes approved for deferral exceeds five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), the amount of taxes deferred for each qualifying property shall be reduced proportionately and the balance of property tax not deferred shall be entered on the property tax notice required by section 63-902, Idaho Code, and shall be payable as required by chapter 9, title 63, Idaho Code.

§ 63-718. Events terminating deferral — Payment of deferred tax and interest.

A deferral of property tax payments shall terminate on the earlier of:

Voluntary payment of the full amount of deferred tax and interest to the state tax commission;

The death of the qualified claimant or if there is more than one (1) qualified claimant, the death of the last surviving qualified claimant;

A sale or other transfer of title to the property or any part of the property except a transfer of title to a surviving spouse of a deceased qualified claimant;

The property no longer qualifies for the exemption provided in section 63-602G, Idaho Code, for residential improvements;

A determination by the state tax commission under section 63-720, Idaho Code, that the deferral of property tax payments was erroneously granted to a person who is not a qualified claimant or in regard to property that is not qualified property.

When a deferral of property tax is terminated any unpaid amount of deferred tax and interest shall be paid to the state tax commission no later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the termination.

Any payments of deferred property tax received by the state tax commission under this section or under sections 63-719 and 63-720, Idaho Code, shall be distributed to the property tax deferral recovery fund which is hereby created. Amounts in the property tax deferral recovery fund are hereby continuously appropriated for the purposes of section 63-3638(5), Idaho Code.

§ 63-719. Tax deed for deficiency in repayment.

Any amount of deferred tax due under section 63-718, Idaho Code, which is not paid to the state tax commission on the due date, is a delinquency subject to the provisions of chapter 10, title 63, Idaho Code, except that references to county and county officials in that chapter shall be taken as references to the state tax commission.

§ 63-720. Recovery of erroneous and other improper deferrals.

In addition to the provisions of section 63-719, Idaho Code, the state tax commission may recover deferrals of tax payments made under sections 63-712 through 63-721, Idaho Code, from any person who elected the deferral under section 63-714, Idaho Code, if the commission determines that:

A deferral was granted to a person who is not a qualified claimant or in regard to property that is not qualified property; or

The owner of the property subject to the deferral does not possess sufficient equity in that property.

The deficiency determination, collection, and enforcement procedures provided by the Idaho income tax act, sections 63-3039, 63-3042, 63-3043 through 63-3064, Idaho Code, shall apply and be available to the commission for enforcement and collection under sections 63-712 through 63-721, Idaho Code, and such sections shall, for this purpose, be considered part of sections 63-712 through 63-721, Idaho Code. Wherever liens or any other proceedings are defined as income tax liens or proceedings, they shall, when applied in enforcement or collection under sections 63-712 through 63-721, Idaho Code, be described as tax deferral liens and proceedings. In connection with such sections, a deficiency shall consist of any amount subject to recovery under this section together with any interest and penalty due thereon.

§ 63-721. Knowingly filing a false claim a misdemeanor.

Every person who applies for deferral of taxes under section 63-714, Idaho Code, knowing that the person for whom the application is made is not a qualified claimant or knowing that the property is not qualified property, is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction thereof shall be punished as provided for misdemeanors in section 18-303, Idaho Code.